Maine, session 132, LD224.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §402, sub-§3, ¶L, as amended by PL 2003, c. 614, §1, is further
amended to read:
L. Records describing security plans, security procedures or risk assessments prepared
specifically for the purpose of preventing or preparing for acts of terrorism, but only to
the extent that release of information contained in the record could reasonably be
expected to jeopardize the physical safety of government personnel or the public.
Information contained in records covered by this paragraph may be disclosed to the
Legislature or, in the case of a political or administrative subdivision, to municipal
officials or board members under conditions that protect the information from further
disclosure. For purposes of this paragraph, "terrorism" means conduct that is designed
to cause serious bodily injury or substantial risk of bodily injury to multiple persons,
substantial damage to multiple structures whether occupied or unoccupied or
substantial physical damage sufficient to disrupt the normal functioning of a critical
infrastructure has the same meaning as in Title 37-B, section 703, subsection 8;
Sec. 2. 37-B MRSA §703, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Cyberattack. "Cyberattack" means activity targeting information and
communications technology infrastructure, systems or services affecting the State or the
State's critical infrastructure, whether physical or non-physical, for the purpose of
disrupting, disabling, destroying or maliciously controlling such infrastructure, systems or
services or destroying the integrity of the data or stealing the information residing thereon.
Sec. 3. 37-B MRSA §703, sub-§8, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 146, §6, is amended
to read:
8. Terrorism. "Terrorism" means the unlawful use of force or violence against
persons or property to intimidate or coerce a government or civilian population.
"Terrorism" includes conduct that is designed to cause serious bodily injury or substantial
risk of bodily injury to multiple persons, substantial damage to multiple structures whether
Page 1 - 132LR0492(03)

occupied or unoccupied or substantial physical damage sufficient to disrupt the normal
functioning of a critical infrastructure; or conduct that constitutes a cyberattack on
information and communications technology infrastructure, systems or services affecting
the State or the State's critical infrastructure, whether physical or non-physical.
Page 2 - 132LR0492(03)